Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-568
Class VI school district; board of education; officers.

The board of education of a Class VI school district shall elect from its members a president, a vice president, a secretary, and a treasurer at the first regular board meeting after the newly elected board members have been sworn in and prior to conducting any other business.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 321.